Massachusetts, session 194th, H2044.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking the words "Petit treason shall be prosecuted and punished as 
murder."